District of Columbia statutes.
8-101.05c

Civil penalties.

(a)

A person who violates this part or a regulation promulgated pursuant to this part shall be civilly liable and shall be subject to a civil penalty of no more than $37,500 per day per offense. The Mayor may adjust this civil penalty by rulemaking to account for inflation and shall adjust this civil penalty by rulemaking to meet or exceed the civil penalty authorized for violations pertaining to the Clean Air Act, approved July 14, 1955 (77 Stat. 392; 42 U.S.C. § 7401 et seq.).

(b)

The Mayor may impose civil infraction penalties, fines, and fees as alternative sanctions for any violation of this part or a regulation promulgated pursuant to this part, pursuant to the procedures of Chapter 18 of Title 2 [§ 2-1801.01 et seq.].

Mar. 15, 1985, D.C. Law 5-165, § 5c
as added Sept. 9, 2014, D.C. Law 20-135, § 101(b), 61 DCR 6767